test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-subst-2tav-i_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
  Noun - äigi: # ok AIGI
    äigi+N+Sg+Nom:   äigi
    äigi+N+Sg+Gen:   ääigi
    äigi+N+Sg+Acc:   ääigi
    äigi+N+Sg+Ill:   ááigán
    äigi+N+Sg+Loc:   ääigist
    äigi+N+Sg+Com:   aigijn
    äigi+N+Sg+Abe:   äˊigittáá
    äigi+N+Ess:      äigin
    äigi+N+Par: äigid
    äigi+N+Pl+Nom:   ääigih
    äigi+N+Pl+Gen:  [aaigij, aˊigij]
    äigi+N+Pl+Acc:   aaigijd
    äigi+N+Pl+Ill:   aigijd
    äigi+N+Pl+Loc:   aaigijn
    äigi+N+Pl+Com:   aˊigijguin
    äigi+N+Pl+Abe:   aˊigijttáá
    
  Noun - cuápci: # ok AIGI
    cuápci+N+Sg+Nom:   cuápˊci
    cuápci+N+Sg+Gen:   cuápci
    cuápci+N+Sg+Acc:   cuápci
    cuápci+N+Sg+Ill:   cuápcán
    cuápci+N+Sg+Loc:   cuápcist
    cuápci+N+Sg+Com:   copcijn
    cuápci+N+Sg+Abe:   cuáˊpcittáá
    cuápci+N+Ess:      cuápˊcin
    cuápci+N+Par:      cuápˊcid
    cuápci+N+Pl+Nom:   cuápcih
    cuápci+N+Pl+Gen:   [coopcij, coˊpcij]
    cuápci+N+Pl+Acc:   coopcijd
    cuápci+N+Pl+Ill:   copcijd
    cuápci+N+Pl+Loc:   coopcijn
    cuápci+N+Pl+Com:   coˊpcijguin
    cuápci+N+Pl+Abe:   coˊpcijttáá
    
  Noun - läbži: # ok AIGI
    läbži+N+Sg+Nom:   läbži
    läbži+N+Sg+Gen:   lääbži
    läbži+N+Sg+Acc:   lääbži
    läbži+N+Sg+Ill:   láábžán
    läbži+N+Sg+Loc:   lääbžist
    läbži+N+Sg+Com:   labžijn
    läbži+N+Sg+Abe:   läˊbžittáá
    läbži+N+Ess:      läbžin
    läbži+N+Par:      läbžid
    läbži+N+Pl+Nom:   lääbžih
    läbži+N+Pl+Gen:  [laabžij, laˊbžij]
    läbži+N+Pl+Acc:   laabžijd
    läbži+N+Pl+Ill:   labžijd
    läbži+N+Pl+Loc:   laabžijn
    läbži+N+Pl+Com:   laˊbžijguin
    läbži+N+Pl+Abe:   laˊbžijttáá    

  Noun - äitti: # ok AIGI
    äitti+N+Sg+Nom:   äitti
    äitti+N+Sg+Gen:   ääiti
    äitti+N+Sg+Acc:   ääiti
    äitti+N+Sg+Ill:   ááitán
    äitti+N+Sg+Loc:   ääitist
    äitti+N+Sg+Com:   aittijn
    äitti+N+Sg+Abe:   äˊitittáá
    äitti+N+Ess:      äittin
    äitti+N+Pl+Nom:   ääitih
    äitti+N+Pl+Gen:  [aaitij, aˊitij]
    äitti+N+Pl+Acc:   aaitijd
    äitti+N+Pl+Ill:   aittijd
    äitti+N+Pl+Loc:   aaitijn
    äitti+N+Pl+Com:   aˊitijguin
    äitti+N+Pl+Abe:   aˊitijttáá

  Noun - sältti: # ok AIGI
    sältti+N+Sg+Nom:   sältti
    sältti+N+Sg+Gen:   säälti
    sältti+N+Sg+Acc:   säälti
    sältti+N+Sg+Ill:   sááltán
    sältti+N+Sg+Loc:   säältist
    sältti+N+Sg+Com:   salttijn
    sältti+N+Sg+Abe:   säˊltittáá
    sältti+N+Ess:      sälttin
    sältti+N+Par:      sälttid
    sältti+N+Pl+Nom:   säältih
    sältti+N+Pl+Gen:  [saaltij, saˊltij]
    sältti+N+Pl+Acc:   saaltijd
    sältti+N+Pl+Ill:   salttijd
    sältti+N+Pl+Loc:   saaltijn
    sältti+N+Pl+Com:   saˊltijguin
    sältti+N+Pl+Abe:   saˊltijttáá
    
  Noun - uábbi: # ok AIGI
    uábbi+N+Sg+Nom:   uábˊbi
    uábbi+N+Sg+Gen:   uábi
    uábbi+N+Sg+Acc:   uábi
    uábbi+N+Sg+Ill:   uábán
    uábbi+N+Sg+Loc:   uábist
    uábbi+N+Sg+Com:   obbijn
    uábbi+N+Sg+Abe:   uáˊbittáá
    uábbi+N+Ess:      uábˊbin
    uábbi+N+Par:      uábˊbid
    uábbi+N+Pl+Nom:   uábih
    uábbi+N+Pl+Gen:  [oobij, oˊbij]
    uábbi+N+Pl+Acc:   oobijd
    uábbi+N+Pl+Ill:   obbijd
    uábbi+N+Pl+Loc:   oobijn
    uábbi+N+Pl+Com:   oˊbijguin
    uábbi+N+Pl+Abe:   oˊbijttáá

  Noun - peldi: # ok KUMPPI
    peldi+N+Sg+Nom:   peldi
    peldi+N+Sg+Gen:   peeldi
    peldi+N+Sg+Acc:   peeldi
    peldi+N+Sg+Ill:   peeldin
    peldi+N+Sg+Loc:   peeldist
    peldi+N+Sg+Com:   peldijn
    peldi+N+Sg+Abe:   peˊldittáá
    peldi+N+Ess:      peldin
    peldi+N+Par:      peldid
    peldi+N+Pl+Nom:   peeldih
    peldi+N+Pl+Gen:  [peeldij, peˊldij]
    peldi+N+Pl+Acc:   peeldijd
    peldi+N+Pl+Ill:   peldijd
    peldi+N+Pl+Loc:   peeldijn
    peldi+N+Pl+Com:   peˊldijguin
    peldi+N+Pl+Abe:   peˊldijttáá

  Noun - stovli: # ok KUMPPI
    stovli+N+Sg+Nom:   stovli
    stovli+N+Sg+Gen:   stoovli
    stovli+N+Sg+Acc:   stoovli
    stovli+N+Sg+Ill:   stoovlin
    stovli+N+Sg+Loc:   stoovlist
    stovli+N+Sg+Com:   stovlijn
    stovli+N+Sg+Abe:   stoˊvlittáá
    stovli+N+Ess:      stovlin
    stovli+N+Par:      stovlid
    stovli+N+Pl+Nom:   stoovlih
    stovli+N+Pl+Gen:  [stoovlij, stoˊvlij]
    stovli+N+Pl+Acc:   stoovlijd
    stovli+N+Pl+Ill:   stovlijd
    stovli+N+Pl+Loc:   stoovlijn
    stovli+N+Pl+Com:   stoˊvlijguin
    stovli+N+Pl+Abe:   stoˊvlijttáá

  Noun - rahti: # ok KUMPPI
    rahti+N+Sg+Nom:   rahti
    rahti+N+Sg+Gen:   raahti
    rahti+N+Sg+Acc:   raahti
    rahti+N+Sg+Ill:   raahtin
    rahti+N+Sg+Loc:   raahtist
    rahti+N+Sg+Com:   rahtijn
    rahti+N+Sg+Abe:   raˊhtittáá
    rahti+N+Ess:      rahtin
    rahti+N+Par:      rahtid
    rahti+N+Pl+Nom:   raahtih
    rahti+N+Pl+Gen:  [raahtij, raˊhtij]
    rahti+N+Pl+Acc:   raahtijd
    rahti+N+Pl+Ill:   rahtijd
    rahti+N+Pl+Loc:   raahtijn
    rahti+N+Pl+Com:   raˊhtijguin
    rahti+N+Pl+Abe:   raˊhtijttáá

  Noun - tatti: # ok KUMPPI
    tatti+N+Sg+Nom:   tatti
    tatti+N+Sg+Gen:   taati
    tatti+N+Sg+Acc:   taati
    tatti+N+Sg+Ill:   taatin
    tatti+N+Sg+Loc:   taatist
    tatti+N+Sg+Com:   tattijn
    tatti+N+Sg+Abe:   taˊtittáá
    tatti+N+Ess:      tattin
    tatti+N+Par:      tattid
    tatti+N+Pl+Nom:   taatih
    tatti+N+Pl+Gen:  [taatij, taˊtij]
    tatti+N+Pl+Acc:   taatijd
    tatti+N+Pl+Ill:   tattijd
    tatti+N+Pl+Loc:   taatijn
    tatti+N+Pl+Com:   taˊtijguin
    tatti+N+Pl+Abe:   taˊtijttáá
    
  Noun - printti: # ok KUMPPI
    printti+N+Sg+Nom:   printti
    printti+N+Sg+Gen:   priinti
    printti+N+Sg+Acc:   priinti
    printti+N+Sg+Ill:   priintin
    printti+N+Sg+Loc:   priintist
    printti+N+Sg+Com:   printtijn
    printti+N+Sg+Abe:   priˊntittáá
    printti+N+Ess:      printtin
    printti+N+Par:      printtid
    printti+N+Pl+Nom:   priintih
    printti+N+Pl+Gen:  [priintij, priˊntij]
    printti+N+Pl+Acc:   priintijd
    printti+N+Pl+Ill:   printtijd
    printti+N+Pl+Loc:   priintijn
    printti+N+Pl+Com:   priˊntijguin
    printti+N+Pl+Abe:   priˊntijttáá

  Noun - torvi: # ok KUMPPI
    torvi+N+Sg+Nom:   torvi
    torvi+N+Sg+Gen:   toorvi
    torvi+N+Sg+Acc:   toorvi
    torvi+N+Sg+Ill:   toorvin
    torvi+N+Sg+Loc:   toorvist
    torvi+N+Sg+Com:   torvijn
    torvi+N+Sg+Abe:   toˊrvittáá
    torvi+N+Ess:      torvin
    torvi+N+Par:      torvid
    torvi+N+Pl+Nom:   toorvih
    torvi+N+Pl+Gen:  [toorvij, toˊrvij]
    torvi+N+Pl+Acc:   toorvijd
    torvi+N+Pl+Ill:   torvijd
    torvi+N+Pl+Loc:   toorvijn
    torvi+N+Pl+Com:   toˊrvijguin
    torvi+N+Pl+Abe:   toˊrvijttáá

  Noun - purkki: # ok KUMPPI
    purkki+N+Sg+Nom:   purkki
    purkki+N+Sg+Gen:   puurki
    purkki+N+Sg+Acc:   puurki
    purkki+N+Sg+Ill:   puurkin
    purkki+N+Sg+Loc:   puurkist
    purkki+N+Sg+Com:   purkkijn
    purkki+N+Sg+Abe:   puˊrkittáá
    purkki+N+Ess:      purkkin
    purkki+N+Par:      purkkid
    purkki+N+Pl+Nom:   puurkih
    purkki+N+Pl+Gen:  [puurkij, puˊrkij]
    purkki+N+Pl+Acc:   puurkijd
    purkki+N+Pl+Ill:   purˊkkijd
    purkki+N+Pl+Loc:   puurkijn
    purkki+N+Pl+Com:   puˊrkijguin
    purkki+N+Pl+Abe:   puˊrkijttáá

  Noun - muŋkki: # ok KUMPPI
    muŋkki+N+Sg+Nom:   muŋkki
    muŋkki+N+Sg+Gen:   muuŋki
    muŋkki+N+Sg+Acc:   muuŋki
    muŋkki+N+Sg+Ill:   muuŋkin
    muŋkki+N+Sg+Loc:   muuŋkist
    muŋkki+N+Sg+Com:   muŋkkijn
    muŋkki+N+Sg+Abe:   muˊŋkittáá
    muŋkki+N+Ess:      muŋkkin
    muŋkki+N+Par:      muŋkkid
    muŋkki+N+Pl+Nom:   muuŋkih
    muŋkki+N+Pl+Gen:  [muuŋkij, muˊŋkij]
    muŋkki+N+Pl+Acc:   muuŋkijd
    muŋkki+N+Pl+Ill:   muŋkkijd
    muŋkki+N+Pl+Loc:   muuŋkijn
    muŋkki+N+Pl+Com:   muˊŋkijguin
    muŋkki+N+Pl+Abe:   muˊŋkijttáá

  Noun - hissi: # ok KUMPPI
    hissi+N+Sg+Nom:   hissi
    hissi+N+Sg+Gen:   hiiṣi
    hissi+N+Sg+Acc:   hiiṣi
    hissi+N+Sg+Ill:   hiiṣin
    hissi+N+Sg+Loc:   hiiṣist
    hissi+N+Sg+Com:   hissijn
    hissi+N+Sg+Abe:   hiˊṣittáá
    hissi+N+Ess:      hissin
    hissi+N+Par:      hissid
    hissi+N+Pl+Nom:   hiiṣih
    hissi+N+Pl+Gen:  [hiiṣij, hiṣij]
    hissi+N+Pl+Acc:   hiiṣijd
    hissi+N+Pl+Ill:   hissijd
    hissi+N+Pl+Loc:   hiiṣijn
    hissi+N+Pl+Com:   hiˊṣijguin
    hissi+N+Pl+Abe:   hiˊṣijttáá

  Noun - veerdi: # ok VEERDI 
    veerdi+N+Sg+Nom:   veerdi
    veerdi+N+Sg+Gen:   veerdi
    veerdi+N+Sg+Acc:   veerdi
    veerdi+N+Sg+Ill:   viärdán
    veerdi+N+Sg+Loc:   veerdist
    veerdi+N+Sg+Com:   verdijn
    veerdi+N+Sg+Abe:   veˊrdittáá
    veerdi+N+Ess:      veerdin
    veerdi+N+Par:      veerdid
    veerdi+N+Pl+Nom:   veerdih
    veerdi+N+Pl+Gen:  [veerdij, veˊrdij]
    veerdi+N+Pl+Acc:   veerdijd
    veerdi+N+Pl+Ill:   verdijd
    veerdi+N+Pl+Loc:   veerdijn
    veerdi+N+Pl+Com:   veˊrdijguin
    veerdi+N+Pl+Abe:   veˊrdijttáá

  Noun - viini: # ok VIINI
    viini+N+Sg+Nom:   viini
    viini+N+Sg+Gen:   viini
    viini+N+Sg+Ill:   viinin
    viini+N+Sg+Loc:   viinist
    viini+N+Sg+Com:   viinijn
    viini+N+Sg+Abe:   viinittáá
    viini+N+Ess:      viinin
    viini+N+Par:      viinid
    viini+N+Pl+Nom:   viinih
    viini+N+Pl+Gen:   viinij
    viini+N+Pl+Acc:   viinijd
    viini+N+Pl+Ill:   viinijd
    viini+N+Pl+Loc:   viinijn
    viini+N+Pl+Com:   viinijguin
    viini+N+Pl+Abe:   viinijttáá

  Noun - riisi: # ok VIINI
    riisi+N+Sg+Nom:   riisi
    riisi+N+Sg+Gen:   riisi
    riisi+N+Sg+Ill:   riisin
    riisi+N+Sg+Loc:   riisist
    riisi+N+Sg+Com:   riisijn
    riisi+N+Sg+Abe:   riisittáá
    riisi+N+Ess:      riisin
    riisi+N+Par:      riisid
    riisi+N+Pl+Nom:   riisih
    riisi+N+Pl+Gen:   riisij
    riisi+N+Pl+Acc:   riisijd
    riisi+N+Pl+Ill:   riisijd
    riisi+N+Pl+Loc:   riisijn
    riisi+N+Pl+Com:   riisijguin
    riisi+N+Pl+Abe:   riisijttáá
    
  Noun - koori: # ok VIINI
    koori+N+Sg+Nom:   koori
    koori+N+Sg+Gen:   koori
    koori+N+Sg+Acc:   koori
    koori+N+Sg+Ill:   koorin
    koori+N+Sg+Loc:   koorist
    koori+N+Sg+Com:   koorijn
    koori+N+Sg+Abe:  [koorittáá, koˊrittáá]
    koori+N+Ess:      koorin
    koori+N+Par:      koorid
    koori+N+Pl+Nom:   koorih
    koori+N+Pl+Gen:  [koorij, koˊrij]
    koori+N+Pl+Acc:   koorijd
    koori+N+Pl+Ill:   koorijd
    koori+N+Pl+Loc:   koorijn
    koori+N+Pl+Com:   koorijguin
    koori+N+Pl+Abe:   koorijttáá

  Noun - čielgi: # ok CIELGI
    čielgi+N+Sg+Nom:   čielgi
    čielgi+N+Sg+Gen:   čielgi
    čielgi+N+Sg+Acc:   čielgi
    čielgi+N+Sg+Ill:   čiälgán
    čielgi+N+Sg+Loc:   čielgist
    čielgi+N+Sg+Com:   čielgijn
    čielgi+N+Sg+Abe:   čieˊlgittáá
    čielgi+N+Ess:      čielgin
    čielgi+N+Par:      čielgid
    čielgi+N+Pl+Nom:   čielgih
    čielgi+N+Pl+Gen:  [čielgij, čieˊlgij]
    čielgi+N+Pl+Acc:   čielgijd
    čielgi+N+Pl+Ill:   čielˊgijd
    čielgi+N+Pl+Loc:   čielgijn
    čielgi+N+Pl+Com:   čieˊlgijguin
    čielgi+N+Pl+Abe:   čieˊlgiittáá

  Noun - siergi: # ok JYELGI
    siergi+N+Sg+Nom:   sierˊgi
    siergi+N+Sg+Gen:   siergi
    siergi+N+Sg+Acc:   siergi
    siergi+N+Sg+Ill:   siärgán
    siergi+N+Sg+Loc:   siergist
    siergi+N+Sg+Com:   sierˊgijn
    siergi+N+Sg+Abe:   sieˊrgittáá
    siergi+N+Ess:      sierˊgin
    siergi+N+Par:      sierˊgid
    siergi+N+Pl+Nom:   siergih
    siergi+N+Pl+Gen:  [siergij, sieˊrgij]
    siergi+N+Pl+Acc:   siergijd
    siergi+N+Pl+Ill:   sierˊgijd
    siergi+N+Pl+Loc:   siergijn
    siergi+N+Pl+Com:   sieˊrgijguin
    siergi+N+Pl+Abe:   sieˊrgijttáá
    
  Noun - jyelgi: # ok JYELGI
    jyelgi+N+Sg+Nom:   jyelˊgi
    jyelgi+N+Sg+Gen:   jyelgi
    jyelgi+N+Sg+Acc:   jyelgi
    jyelgi+N+Sg+Ill:   juálgán
    jyelgi+N+Sg+Loc:   jyelgist
    jyelgi+N+Sg+Com:   juolˊgijn
    jyelgi+N+Sg+Abe:   jyeˊlgittáá
    jyelgi+N+Ess:      jyelˊgin
    jyelgi+N+Par:      jyelˊgid
    jyelgi+N+Pl+Nom:   jyelgih
    jyelgi+N+Pl+Gen:  [juolgij, juoˊlgij]
    jyelgi+N+Pl+Acc:   juolgijd
    jyelgi+N+Pl+Ill:   juolˊgijd
    jyelgi+N+Pl+Loc:   juolgijn
    jyelgi+N+Pl+Com:   juoˊlgijguin
    jyelgi+N+Pl+Abe:   juoˊlgijttáá
